Utah statutes.
48-2a-1103 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.



Enacted by Chapter 233, 1990 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

